Utah statutes.
57-2-15.   Evidence required for certificate of proof.
No certificate of any such proof shall be made unless a competent and credible
witness shall state on oath or affirmation that he personally knew the person
whose name is subscribed thereto as a party, well knows his signature, stating
his means of knowledge, and believes the name of the party subscribed thereto
as a party was subscribed by such person; nor unless a competent and credible
witness shall in like manner state that he personally knew the person whose
name is subscribed to such conveyance as a witness, well knows his signature,
stating his means of knowledge, and believes the name subscribed thereto as a
witness was thereto subscribed by such person.
